Utah statutes.
53B-7-502.   Higher Education Tuition Assistance Program.
(1)  There is created the Utah Higher Education Tuition Assistance Program,
hereafter referred to in this part as the program.
(2)  The board shall administer the program.
(3)  The program shall be funded through appropriations by the Legislature.
(4)  Money appropriated for the program shall be available only for need-based
grants to higher education students, as provided in this part.
(5) (a)  The board shall adopt rules for administration of the program, in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(b)  The rules shall include the requirements that money appropriated to the
program for a specific fiscal year, plus any remaining balance at the end of
the preceding fiscal year, shall be allocated to eligible institutions on the
following basis:
(i)  the board shall distribute 50% of the amount available for allocation
each fiscal year in equal proportions to:
(A)  Snow College, main campus and extensions;
(B)  Dixie State College, main campus and extensions;
(C)  College of Eastern Utah, main campus and extensions;
(D)  College of Eastern Utah, San Juan Campus and extensions;
(E)  Utah Valley University, main campus and extensions;
(F)  Salt Lake Community College, Taylorsville campus and extensions; and
(G)  Salt Lake Community College, South City Campus; and
(ii)  the board shall distribute 50% of the amount available for allocation
each fiscal year to the Utah State University for its instructional centers at
Roosevelt, Blanding, Randolph, Price, Moab, Brigham City, Tooele, Richfield,
and Ephraim, and other centers as may be determined by the board.
(6)  Higher education institutions may submit applications to the board, for
specific eligible entities, for grants to students with demonstrated financial
need, determined by criteria established by the board.
